Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1876.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [62W.16] INCLUSION OF LOWER-COST DRUGS IN FORMULARY. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply. new text end new text begin (b) "Biologic" has the meaning provided in section 62J.86, subdivision 3. new text end new text begin (c) "Biosimilar" has the meaning provided in section 62J.84, subdivision 2, paragraph (b). new text end new text begin (d) "Brand name drug" has the meaning provided in section 62J.84, subdivision 2, paragraph (c). new text end new text begin (e) "Equivalent" means: new text end new text begin (1) with respect to a generic drug, the brand name drug against which the generic drug is evaluated by the United States Food and Drug Administration under United States Code, title 21, section 355(j); and new text end new text begin (2) with respect to a biosimilar, the brand name drug biological product as defined in United States Code, title 42, section 262(i). new text end new text begin (f) "Generic drug" has the meaning provided in section 62J.84, subdivision 2, paragraph (e). new text end new text begin (g) "Health plan" means a policy, contract, certificate, or agreement defined in section 62A.011, subdivision 3. new text end new text begin (h) "Out-of-pocket cost" means any coinsurance, co-payment, or other form of cost-sharing for which a patient is responsible. new text end new text begin (i) "Wholesale acquisition cost" has the meaning provided in section 62J.86, subdivision 11. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Brand name, generic, and biosimilar drugs; inclusion of lowest-cost drug in formulary. new text end new text begin (a) If a pharmacy benefit manager or health carrier includes in its formulary a brand name drug, it must also include in its formulary, if applicable, the equivalent generic drug that has a wholesale acquisition cost that is lower than the wholesale acquisition cost of the brand name drug. new text end new text begin (b) If a pharmacy benefit manager or health carrier includes in its formulary a generic drug, it must also include in its formulary, if applicable, the brand name drug to which the generic drug is equivalent, if the brand name drug has a wholesale acquisition cost that is lower than the wholesale acquisition cost of the generic drug included in the formulary. new text end new text begin (c) If a pharmacy benefit manager or health carrier includes in its formulary a brand name biologic, it must also include in its formulary, if applicable, the equivalent biosimilar that has a wholesale acquisition cost that is lower than: new text end new text begin (1) the wholesale acquisition cost of the brand name biologic; and new text end new text begin (2) the wholesale acquisition cost of any other equivalent biosimilar. new text end new text begin (d) If a pharmacy benefit manager or health carrier includes in its formulary a biosimilar, it must also include in its formulary, if applicable, the brand name biologic to which the biosimilar is equivalent, if the brand name biologic has a wholesale acquisition cost that is lower than: new text end new text begin (1) the wholesale acquisition cost of the biosimilar included in the formulary; and new text end new text begin (2) the wholesale acquisition cost of any other equivalent biosimilar. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin New generic and biosimilar drugs; inclusion of lowest-cost drug in formulary. new text end new text begin (a) If a generic drug is approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration, is marketed pursuant to that approval, and has a wholesale acquisition cost that is less than the brand name drug already included in the formulary of a pharmacy benefit manager or health carrier, the pharmacy benefit manager or health carrier must immediately make the newly approved generic drug available on its formulary. new text end new text begin (b) If a biosimilar is approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration, is marketed pursuant to that approval, and has a wholesale acquisition cost that is less than the brand name biologic or biosimilar with the lowest wholesale acquisition cost already included in the formulary of a pharmacy benefit manager or health carrier, the pharmacy benefit manager or health carrier must immediately make the newly approved biosimilar available on its formulary. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Formulary structure and tiering. new text end new text begin (a) A pharmacy benefit manager or health carrier must structure its formulary and any formulary tiers for each health plan in a manner that gives preference to the brand name drug or the equivalent generic drug that has the lowest out-of-pocket cost to the patient purchasing the drug product. The pharmacy benefit manager or health carrier must not impose any prior authorization or step therapy requirement or other limitation on coverage of the drug product with the lowest out-of-pocket cost to the patient under the patient's health plan, or impose a restriction on a pharmacy that makes it more difficult for the patient under the patient's health plan to obtain coverage of or access to the drug product with the lowest out-of-pocket cost to the patient. new text end new text begin (b) A pharmacy benefit manager or health carrier must structure its formulary and any formulary tiers for each health plan in a manner that gives preference to the brand name biologic or the equivalent biosimilar that has the lowest out-of-pocket cost to the patient purchasing the drug product. The pharmacy benefit manager or health carrier must not impose any prior authorization or step therapy requirement or other limitation on coverage of the drug product with the lowest out-of-pocket cost to the patient under the patient's health plan, or impose a restriction on a pharmacy that makes it more difficult for the patient under the patient's health plan to obtain coverage of or access to the drug product with the lowest out-of-pocket cost to the patient. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Exception. new text end new text begin This section does not apply to a pharmacy benefit manager or health carrier if the covered person's cost-sharing obligation is equal to or less than: new text end new text begin (1) $25 for a generic drug; and new text end new text begin (2) $55 for a brand name drug. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2026. new text end